Utah statutes.
32A-11a-108.   Reasonable compensation -- Arbitration.
(1)  If a supplier violates Section 32A-11a-103 or 32A-11a-107, the supplier
shall be liable to the wholesaler for the laid-in cost of inventory of the
affected brands plus any diminution in the fair market value of the
wholesaler's business with relation to the affected brands.  In determining
fair market value, consideration shall be given to all elements of value,
including good will and going concern value.
(2) (a)  A distributorship agreement may require that any or all disputes
between a supplier and a wholesaler be submitted to binding arbitration.  In
the absence of an applicable arbitration provision in the distributorship
agreement, either the supplier or the wholesaler may request arbitration if a
supplier and a wholesaler are unable to mutually agree on:
(i)  whether or not good cause exists for termination or nonrenewal;
(ii)  whether or not the supplier unreasonably withheld approval of a sale or
transfer under Section 32A-11a-107; or
(iii)  the reasonable compensation to be paid for the value of the
wholesaler's business in accordance with Subsection (1).
(b)  If a supplier or wholesaler requests arbitration under Subsection (2)(a)
and the other party agrees to submit the matter to arbitration, an arbitration
panel shall be created with the following members:
(i)  one member selected by the supplier in a writing delivered to the
wholesaler within ten business days of the date arbitration was requested
under Subsection (2)(a);
(ii)  one member selected by the wholesaler in a writing delivered to the
supplier within ten business days of the date arbitration was requested under
Subsection (2)(a); and
(iii)  one member selected by the two arbitrators appointed under Subsections
(2)(b)(i) and (ii).
(c)  If the arbitrators selected under Subsection (2)(b)(iii) fail to choose a
third arbitrator within ten business days of their selection, a judge of a
district court in the county in which the wholesaler's principal place of
business is located shall select the third arbitrator.
(d)  Arbitration costs shall be divided equally between the wholesaler and the
supplier.
(e)  The award of the arbitration panel is binding on the parties unless
appealed within 20 days from the date of the award.
(f)  Subject to the requirements of this chapter, arbitration and all
proceedings on appeal shall be governed by Title 78B, Chapter 11, Utah Uniform
Arbitration Act.
